California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A borrower may not waive any right or remedy under this article. This subdivision shall not be deemed to prohibit a bona fide settlement, release or compromise of any claim under this article.

(b) If a loan is negotiated in violation of any section of this article, the licensee, on demand, shall return to the borrower any bonus, brokerage or commission paid or payable under subdivision (b) of Section 10242 for negotiation of such loans. In the event such demand is not satisfied within 20 days from the date of written demand, the borrower may commence an action under this subdivision and may recover actual damages or twice any bonus, brokerage, or commission paid or payable under subdivision (b) of Section 10242 for the negotiation of said loan whichever is greater, plus costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

The “date of written demand” shall mean either the date upon which the written demand is personally delivered to the licensee or the date upon which the written demand is mailed to the licensee.

A licensee may not be held liable in any action brought under this section for a violation of this article if the licensee shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error.

If the borrower proceeds under this section he may not proceed under Section 10246 as to the same breach.

(c) If a real estate licensee subject to the provisions of this article violates any provision of Section 10241.1 he shall be liable for, and pay over to the borrower, any commission or experience rating dividend attributable to the insurance written on that loan received by the licensee as a result of the sale of such insurance to the borrower in violation of Section 10241.1 in addition to any premium loss due to short rate cancellation of any insurance subject to Section 10248.1 which was purchased by the borrower.

(d) No action for damages shall be maintained under this section unless brought within two years after the maturity of the loan.

(e) The provisions of this article are not exclusive. The remedies provided for herein shall be in addition to any other procedures or remedies provided under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

10248.3.

The provisions of this article shall apply only to those loans otherwise subject to this article which are made or negotiated by real estate brokers acting within the meaning of subdivision (d) of Section 10131 or subdivision (b) of Section 10240.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 886, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Out-of-State Land Promotions [10249. - 10249.93.]

10249.

(a) A person acting as a principal or agent who intends, in this state, to sell or lease or offer for sale or lease lots, parcels, or interests in a subdivision, as defined in Section 10249.1, situated outside of this state but within the United States, shall, prior to a sale, lease, or offer, register the subdivision with the commissioner. An application for registration shall be made on a form acceptable to the commissioner and include, together with a fee, a description of the offering, certification by the applicant that the subdivision is in compliance with all applicable requirements of the state or states wherein the project is located, evidence of this compliance, if applicable, and a consent to service as described in Section 10249.92.

(b) The commissioner, within 10 days of receipt of an application of registration, shall provide the applicant with notice of the completion of the registration or a notice of deficiency. If the department does not provide a notice within 10 days, the registration shall be deemed complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 587, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.1.

“Subdivision,” as used in Section 10249, includes all of the following:

(a) Improved or unimproved land or lands divided or proposed to be divided for the purpose of sale or lease, whether immediate or future, into five or more lots or parcels.

(b) Improved or unimproved land or lands in which, for the purpose of sale or lease, whether immediate or future, five or more undivided interests are created or proposed to be created.

(c) “Subdivision,” as defined in Section 11004.5, excluding “subdivision” as defined in subdivision (e) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 723, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.3.

(a) The commissioner may by regulation prescribe filing fees in connection with registrations with the department pursuant to the provisions of this article that are lower than the maximum fees specified in subdivision (b) if the commissioner determines that the lower fees are sufficient to offset the costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this article. The commissioner shall hold at least one hearing each calendar year to determine if lower fees than those specified in subdivision (b) should be prescribed. At this hearing, the department shall report on the financial status of the department, including the revenues, expenditures, and reserves as of the end of the previous fiscal year. The department shall post a hearing notice 15 days in advance of the hearing that includes the required information about the
 financial status of the department.

(b) The filing fee for an application for a registration with the department pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be set at the amount prescribed below and shall not exceed the maximum specified for each subdivision or phase of the subdivision in which interests are to be offered for sale or lease:

(1) An application for an original registration: One hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130).

(2) An application for a renewal registration: One hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130).

(3) An application for an amended registration: One hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130).

(c) All fees collected by the Department of Real Estate under authority of this article shall be deposited into the Real Estate Fund under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10450) of Part 1. All fees received by the department pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be deemed earned upon receipt. No part of any fee is refundable unless the commissioner determines that it was paid as a result of mistake or inadvertence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 14.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Section 10249 or 11000, it is unlawful for a person, in this state, to sell or lease or offer for sale or lease lots, parcels, or interests in a subdivision, as defined in Section 10249.1, entirely located outside of this state but within the United States, unless any printed material, literature, advertising, or invitation in this state relating to that sale, lease, or offer clearly and conspicuously contains the following disclaimer in at least 10-point type: 

WARNING: THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF REAL ESTATE HAS NOT INSPECTED, EXAMINED, OR QUALIFIED THIS
 OFFERING. 

(b) If an offer on property described in subdivision (a) is not initially made in writing, the disclaimer set forth in subdivision (c) shall be received by the offeree in writing prior to a visit to a location, sales presentation, or contact with a person representing the offeror, when the visit or contact was scheduled or arranged by the offeror or its representative. The deposit of the disclaimer in the United States mail, addressed to the offeree and with first-class postage prepaid, at least five days prior to the scheduled or arranged visit or contact, shall be deemed to constitute delivery for purposes of this section.

(c) If a California resident is presented with an agreement or contract
 to lease or purchase any property described in subdivision (a), when an offer to lease or purchase that property was made to that resident in California, a copy of the disclaimer set forth in this subdivision shall be inserted in at least 10-point type at the top of the first page of that agreement or contract and shall be initialed by that California resident. 

WARNING: THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF REAL ESTATE HAS NOT QUALIFIED, INSPECTED, OR EXAMINED THIS OFFERING, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE CONDITION OF TITLE, THE STATUS OF BLANKET LIENS ON THE PROJECT (IF ANY), ARRANGEMENTS TO ASSURE PROJECT COMPLETION, ESCROW PRACTICES, CONTROL OVER PROJECT MANAGEMENT, RACIALLY DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES (IF ANY), TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND PRICE OF THE OFFER, CONTROL OVER ANNUAL
 ASSESSMENTS (IF ANY), OR THE AVAILABILITY OF WATER, SERVICES, UTILITIES, OR IMPROVEMENTS. IT MAY BE ADVISABLE FOR YOU TO CONSULT AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER KNOWLEDGEABLE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS FAMILIAR WITH REAL ESTATE AND DEVELOPMENT LAW IN THE STATE WHERE THIS SUBDIVISION IS SITUATED.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 26.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Section 10249 or 11000, it is unlawful for a person, in this state, to sell or lease or offer for sale or lease a lot, parcel, or interest in a subdivision, located outside the United States, unless the printed material, literature, advertising, or invitation in this state relating to that sale, lease, or offer clearly and conspicuously contains the following disclaimer in at least 10-point capital type: 

WARNING: THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF REAL ESTATE HAS NOT EXAMINED THIS OFFERING, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE CONDITION OF TITLE, THE STATUS OF BLANKET LIENS ON
 THE PROJECT (IF ANY), ARRANGEMENTS TO ASSURE PROJECT COMPLETION, ESCROW PRACTICES, CONTROL OVER PROJECT MANAGEMENT, RACIALLY DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES (IF ANY), TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND PRICE OF THE OFFER, CONTROL OVER ANNUAL ASSESSMENTS (IF ANY), OR THE AVAILABILITY OF WATER, SERVICES, UTILITIES, OR IMPROVEMENTS. IT MAY BE ADVISABLE FOR YOU TO CONSULT AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER KNOWLEDGEABLE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS FAMILIAR WITH REAL ESTATE AND DEVELOPMENT LAW IN THE COUNTRY WHERE THIS SUBDIVISION IS SITUATED. 

(b) If an offer on property described in subdivision (a) is not initially made in writing, the foregoing disclaimer shall be received by the offeree in writing prior to a visit to a location, sales presentation, or contact with a person
 representing the offeror, when the visit or contact was scheduled or arranged by the offeror or its representative. The deposit of the disclaimer in the United States mail, addressed to the offeree and with first-class postage prepaid, at least five days prior to the scheduled or arranged visit or contact, shall be deemed to constitute delivery for purposes of this section.

(c) If any California resident is presented with an agreement or contract to lease or purchase a property described in subdivision (a), when an offer to lease or purchase that property was made to that resident in California, a copy of the disclaimer set forth in subdivision (a) shall be inserted in at least 10-point type at the top of the first page of that agreement or contract and shall be initialed by that California resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 27.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.91.

The term of a registration issued pursuant to this article shall be one year, unless the commissioner by regulation prescribes a longer term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 723, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.92.

A registration application pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be accompanied by an irrevocable consent stating that if in any action commenced against the applicant in this state personal service of process upon the applicant cannot be made after the exercise of due diligence, a valid service may thereupon be made upon the applicant by delivering the process to the Secretary of State.

Insofar as possible, the provisions of Section 1018 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of process on the Secretary of State are applicable to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 723, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10249.93.

(a) If the commissioner finds, based on available evidence, that a person is violating any provision of this article or a regulation of the commissioner adopted to implement a provision of this article, the commissioner may order the person to cease and desist from committing the violation or to cease and desist from the further sale or lease of an interest in the subdivision until the violation is corrected.

(b) A person to whom an order is directed shall, upon receipt of the order, immediately cease the activity described in the order.

(c) The person to whom the order is directed may request a hearing in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11019.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 587, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Revenue [10450. - 10464.]



  ARTICLE 1. Real Estate Fund [10450. - 10454.]

10450.

All fees charged and collected under this part and under Chapter 1 of Part 2, except as provided in this chapter, shall be paid by the commissioner at least once a month, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof, into the Treasury of the State to the credit of the Real Estate Fund, which fund is continued in existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10450.6.

There shall be separate accounts in the Real Estate Fund for purposes of real estate education and research and for purposes of recovery which shall be known respectively as the Education and Research Account and the Consumer Recovery Account. The commissioner may, by regulation, require that up to 8 percent, or any lesser amount that he or she deems appropriate, of the amount of any license fee collected under this part be credited to the Education and Research Account. Twelve percent of the amount of any license fee collected shall be credited to the Consumer Recovery Account, provided, however, that if as of June 30 of any fiscal year the balance of funds in the Consumer Recovery Account is at least three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000), all
 funds in excess of this amount which have been credited to the Consumer Recovery Account shall instead be credited to the Real Estate Fund. As long as the balance of funds in the Consumer Recovery Account exceeds three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000), all license fees collected, except for the percentage of license fees credited to the Education and Research Account, shall be credited to the Real Estate Fund. Funds in the Education and Research Account shall be used by the commissioner in accordance with Section 10451.5. The Consumer Recovery Account is continuously appropriated for carrying out Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 10470).

As used in this part or any other provision of law, “Recovery Account” shall be deemed to refer to the Consumer Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 15.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10451.

All money paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Real Estate Fund is hereby appropriated to be used by the commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this part and Chapter 1 of Part 2, including the payment of the salaries of the commissioner and his deputies, clerks and assistants. The money credited to the fund shall remain therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10451.5.

(a) All money paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Education and Research Account in the Real Estate Fund pursuant to Section 10450.6 is available for appropriation by the Legislature to be used by the commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, in the advancement of education and research in real estate at the University of California, state colleges and community colleges, or in contracting for a particular research project in the field of real estate for the state with any university in the State of California accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or with any corporation or association qualified to perform such research.

(b) If the balance in the Education and Research Account is more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), the Real Estate Commissioner may authorize the transfer of all or part of such surplus amount to the Real Estate Fund and may authorize the return to the Education and Research Account of all or part of any amount previously transferred to the Real Estate Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), if at any time the amount of funds credited to the Real Estate Fund, including any amounts credited to the separate accounts for Education and Research and Recovery, is less than 25 percent of the department’s authorized expenditures for the following fiscal year, the commissioner may transfer any or all of the funds credited to the Education and Research Account to the Real Estate Fund. The commissioner may authorize the return to the Education and Research Account of all or part of any amount previously transferred to the Real Estate Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10452.

The Controller shall draw his warrant on the respective funds from time to time in favor of the commissioner for the amounts expended under his direction, and the Treasurer shall pay the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10453.

All of the expenditures of the commissioner, including his salary, shall be paid only from the Real Estate Fund except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10454.

The commissioner may, with the consent of the Department of Finance, withdraw from the Real Estate Fund moneys to be used as a revolving fund where cash advances are necessary. The commissioner shall account for the sum withdrawn from the revolving fund at any time upon demand of the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemption from Fees [10460. - 10464.]

10460.

As used in this article:

(a) “Military licensee” refers to a person who, while holding a license or license endorsement under the Real Estate Law, or any of the statutes codified therein, entered the military service of the United States and notifies the commissioner of that fact within six months of such entry.

(b) “Persons in the military service of the United States” includes the following persons and no others: all members of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the Marine Corps, the Merchant Marine in time of war, the Coast Guard, the National Guard, and all officers of the Public Health Service
 detailed by proper authority for duty either with the Army or the Navy.

(c) “Military service” signifies federal service after October 1, 1940, on active duty with any branch of service heretofore referred to or mentioned as well as training or education under the supervision of the United States preliminary to induction into the military service. The terms “active service” or “active duty” include the period during which a person in military service is absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 7.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10461.

A military licensee shall not be required to renew his or her license or license endorsement under this part, or his or her license under Chapter 19 of Division 3, until the beginning of the license or license endorsement period which first commences (a) after his or her again engaging in business, or (b) after one year following termination of military service, whichever is the earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 8.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10462.

A military licensee shall not be entitled to the privileges of this article if he receives a dishonorable discharge from the military service of the United States or if he voluntarily remains in the military service for more than seven years from the date of notification to the commissioner as provided by subdivision (a) of Section 10460.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

10463.

A person who would qualify as a military licensee except for the failure to notify the commissioner of his or her entry into the military service of the United States may apply to the commissioner for reinstatement of his or her license or license endorsement upon resuming business or within one year following termination of military service, whichever is earlier. The commissioner shall reinstate the applicant if he or she finds that the applicant would be entitled to the privileges of this article except for his or her failure to give the commissioner notice of his or her entry into the military service of the United States and that the applicant has complied with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170). In the event the applicant failed to notify the commissioner
 of his or her entry into the military service as provided, he or she shall be required to submit proof of his or her previous licensure or license endorsement within seven years of the date of entry into the military service to permit reinstatement of his or her license or license endorsement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 9.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10464.

Section 114 of this code does not apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 225.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Real Estate Recovery Program [10470. - 10481.]

10470.

If, on June 30 of any year, the balance remaining in the Consumer Recovery Account in the Real Estate Fund is less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), every licensed broker, when obtaining or renewing any broker license within four years thereafter, shall pay, in addition to the license fee, a fee of seven dollars ($7); every licensed salesperson, when obtaining or renewing such license within four years thereafter, shall pay, in addition to the license fee, a fee of four dollars ($4); and every person holding a prepaid rental listing service license, when obtaining or renewing that license within two years thereafter, shall pay, in addition to the application fee, a fee of one dollar ($1). The fees from the broker, salesperson, and prepaid rental listing service licensees shall be paid into the
 State Treasury and credited to the Consumer Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 436, Sec. 6.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10470.1.

(a) In addition to the amount paid into the Consumer Recovery Account as set forth in Section 10450.6, the Real Estate Commissioner may authorize the transfer from the Real Estate Fund to the Consumer Recovery Account of any amounts as are deemed necessary.

(b) If the balance remaining in the Consumer Recovery Account contains more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), the commissioner may authorize the transfer of all or part of the surplus amount into the Real Estate Fund.

(c) The commissioner may authorize the return to the Consumer Recovery Account of all or any amount previously transferred to the Real
 Estate Fund under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 17.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.

(a) When an aggrieved person obtains (1) a final judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, a criminal restitution order issued pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code or Section 3663 of Title 18 of the United States Code, or (2) an arbitration award that includes findings of fact and conclusions of law rendered in accordance with the rules established by the American Arbitration Association or another recognized arbitration body, and in accordance with Sections 1281 to 1294.2, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure when applicable, and when the arbitration award has been confirmed and reduced to judgment pursuant to Section 1287.4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, against a defendant based upon the defendant’s fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit, made with intent to
 defraud, or conversion of trust funds, arising directly out of any transaction in which the defendant, while licensed under this part, performed acts for which a real estate license or a prepaid rental listing service license was required, the aggrieved person may, upon the judgment becoming final, file an application with the Department of Real Estate for payment from the Consumer Recovery Account, within the limitations specified in Section 10474, of the amount unpaid on the judgment that represents an actual and direct loss to the claimant in the transaction. As used in this chapter, “court of competent jurisdiction” includes the federal courts, but does not include the courts of another state.

(b) The application shall be delivered in person, by certified mail, or electronically in a manner prescribed by the department, to an office of the department not later than one year after the judgment has become final.

(c) The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the department, verified by the claimant, and shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the claimant.

(2) If the claimant is represented by an attorney, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney.

(3) The identification of the judgment, the amount of the claim and an explanation of its computation.

(4) A detailed narrative statement of the facts in explanation of the allegations of the complaint upon which the underlying judgment is based.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a statement by the
 claimant, signed under penalty of perjury, that the complaint upon which the underlying judgment is based was prosecuted conscientiously and in good faith. As used in this section, “conscientiously and in good faith” means that no party potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction was intentionally and without good cause omitted from the complaint, that no party named in the complaint who otherwise reasonably appeared capable of responding in damages was dismissed from the complaint intentionally and without good cause, and that the claimant employed no other procedural means contrary to the diligent prosecution of the complaint in order to seek to qualify for the Consumer Recovery Account.

(B) For the purpose of an application based on a criminal restitution order, all of the following statements by the claimant:

(i) The claimant has not intentionally and
 without good cause failed to pursue any person potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction other than a defendant who is the subject of a criminal restitution order.

(ii) The claimant has not intentionally and without good cause failed to pursue in a civil action for damages all persons potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction who otherwise reasonably appeared capable of responding in damages other than a defendant who is the subject of a criminal restitution order.

(iii) The claimant employed no other procedural means contrary to the diligent prosecution of the complaint in order to seek to qualify for the Consumer Recovery Account.

(6) The name and address of the judgment debtor or, if not known, the names and addresses of persons who may know the judgment debtor’s
 present whereabouts.

(7) The following representations and information from the claimant:

(A) That the claimant is not a spouse of the judgment debtor nor a personal representative of the spouse.

(B) That the claimant has complied with all of the requirements of this chapter.

(C) That the judgment underlying the claim meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(D) A description of searches and inquiries conducted by or on behalf of the claimant with respect to the judgment debtor’s assets liable to be sold or applied to satisfaction of the judgment, an itemized valuation of the assets discovered, and the results of actions by the claimant to have the assets applied to satisfaction of the
 judgment.

(E) That the claimant has diligently pursued collection efforts against all judgment debtors and all other persons liable to the claimant in the transaction that is the basis for the underlying judgment.

(F) That the underlying judgment and debt have not been discharged in bankruptcy, or, in the case of a bankruptcy proceeding that is open at or after the time of the filing of the application, that the judgment and debt have been declared to be nondischargeable.

(G) That the application was submitted to the department, as prescribed in subdivision (b), no later than one year after the underlying judgment became final.

(d) If the claimant is basing the application upon a judgment against a salesperson, and the claimant has not obtained a
 judgment against that salesperson’s employing broker, if any, or has not diligently pursued the assets of that broker, the application shall be denied for failure to diligently pursue the assets of all other persons liable to the claimant in the transaction unless the claimant can demonstrate, by clear and convincing evidence, either that the salesperson was not employed by a broker at the time of the transaction, or that the salesperson’s employing broker would not have been liable to the claimant because the salesperson was acting outside the scope of their employment by the broker in the transaction.

(e) The application form shall include detailed instructions with respect to documentary evidence, pleadings, court rulings, the products of discovery in the underlying litigation, and a notice to the applicant of their obligation to protect the underlying judgment from discharge in bankruptcy, to be appended to the application.

(f) An application for payment from the Consumer Recovery Account that is based on a criminal restitution order shall comply with all of the requirements of this chapter. For the purpose of an application based on a criminal restitution order, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Judgment” means the criminal restitution order.

(2) “Complaint” means the facts of the underlying transaction upon which the criminal restitution order is based.

(3) “Judgment debtor” means any defendant who is the subject of the criminal restitution order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 90.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.1.

(a) The claimant shall serve a copy of the notice prescribed in subdivision (e) together with a copy of the application upon the judgment debtor by personal service, by certified mail, or by publication, as set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) If the judgment debtor holds an unexpired and unrevoked license issued by the department, service of the notice and a copy of the application may be made by certified mail addressed to the judgment debtor at the latest business or residence address on file with the department. If the judgment debtor does not hold an unexpired and unrevoked license issued by the department and personal service cannot be effected through the exercise of reasonable
 diligence, the claimant shall serve the judgment debtor by one publication of the notice in each of two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the judgment debtor was last known to reside.

(c) If the application is served upon the judgment debtor by certified mail, service is complete five days after mailing if the place of address is within the State of California, 10 days after mailing if the place of address is outside the State of California but within the United States, and 20 days after mailing if the place of address is outside the United States. Personal service is complete on the date of service. Service by publication is complete upon completion of the second week of publication.

(d) If a judgment debtor wishes to contest
 payment of an application by the commissioner, the debtor shall mail or deliver a written response to the application addressed to the department at its headquarters office within 30 days after service of the notice and application, and shall mail or deliver a copy of the response to the claimant. If a judgment debtor fails to mail or deliver a timely response, the debtor shall have waived their right to present objections to payment.

(e) The notice served upon the judgment debtor shall include the following statement:“NOTICE: Based upon a judgment entered against you in favor of (name of claimant), application for payment from the Consumer Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund is being made to the Department of Real Estate.“If payment is made from the Consumer Recovery Account on an application where the final judgment was established by clear and convincing evidence or the Real Estate Commissioner determined that the claimant provided clear and convincing evidence of the judgment debtor’s fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust funds, all licenses and license rights that you have under the Real Estate Law will be automatically suspended on the date of payment and cannot be reinstated until the Consumer Recovery Account has been reimbursed for the amount paid plus interest at the prevailing rate.“If you wish to contest payment by the Real Estate
 Commissioner, you must file a written response to the application addressed to the Department of Real Estate at ___________ within 30 days after mailing, delivery, or publication of this notice and mail or deliver a copy of that response to the claimant. If you fail to do so, you will have waived your right to present your objections to payment.”(f) If a judgment debtor fails to mail or deliver a written response to the application with the department within 30 days after personal service, mailing, or final publication of the notice, the judgment debtor shall not thereafter be entitled to notice of any action taken or proposed to be taken by the commissioner with respect to the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 25.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.2.

(a) If the commissioner determines that the application as submitted by the claimant fails to comply substantially with the requirements of Section 10471 or with the requirements of a regulation adopted by the commissioner under authority of Section 10080, the commissioner shall, within 15 days after receipt of the application, mail an itemized list of deficiencies to the claimant.

(b) The time within which the commissioner is required to act under Section 10471.3 shall be measured from the date of receipt by the department of an application that is substantially
 complete. In the event of an irreconcilable dispute between the claimant and the commissioner on the question of whether the application is substantially complete, the claimant may immediately file the claim with the court pursuant to Section 10472.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.3.

(a) The commissioner shall render a final written decision on the application within 90 days after a completed application has been received unless the claimant agrees in writing to extend the time within which the commissioner may render a decision.

(b) The commissioner may deny or grant the application or may enter into a compromise with the claimant to pay less in settlement than the full amount of the claim. If the claimant refuses to accept a settlement of the claim offered by the commissioner, the written decision of the commissioner shall be to deny the claim or it shall be deemed denied if a written decision is not rendered within the time specified in subdivision (a).
 Evidence of settlement offers and discussions between the commissioner and the claimant shall not be competent evidence in judicial proceedings undertaken by the claimant pursuant to Section 10472.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 20.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.4.

(a) In its consideration and investigation of an application, the department shall have recourse to all appropriate means of investigation and discovery available to it under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The commissioner may grant payment on an application if the final judgment satisfies the requirements of Section 10471 and was established by proof by preponderance of the evidence, or a higher standard of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 26.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.5.

(a) The commissioner shall give notice of a decision rendered with respect to the application to the claimant and to a judgment debtor who has filed a timely response to the application in accordance with Section 10471.1.

(b) If the application is denied, the notice to the claimant and judgment debtor shall include the following:

“Claimant’s application has been denied. If the claimant wishes to pursue the application in court, the claimant must file the application as follows in a superior court of this state not later than six months after receipt of this notice, pursuant to Section 10472 of the Business and Professions Code. If the underlying
 judgment is a California state court judgment, the application shall be filed in the court in which the underlying judgment was entered. If the underlying judgment is a federal court judgment, the application shall be filed in the superior court of any county within California that would have been a proper venue if the underlying lawsuit had been filed in a California state court, or in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento.”

(c) If the decision of the commissioner is to make a payment to the claimant out of the Consumer Recovery Account, the following notice shall be given to the judgment debtor along with a copy of the decision of the commissioner:

“The decision of the Real Estate Commissioner on the application of ____ is to pay $____ from the Consumer Recovery Account. A copy of
 that decision is enclosed.”

(d) If the decision of the commissioner is to make a payment to the claimant out of the Consumer Recovery Account and to suspend the license of the judgment debtor, the following notice shall be given to the judgment debtor along with a copy of the decision of the commissioner: